Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2420.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 30-3-40.3 of the General Laws in Chapter 30-3 entitled "National
Guard" is hereby amended to read as follows:
30-3-40.3. Educational benefits for National Guard members.
(a) For the purpose of this section, the following terms are defined as follows:
(1) “Dependent(s)” means the national guard member’s immediate family members
enrolled in the defense enrollment reporting eligibility system (DEERS).
(2) “National guard member” means an airman or a solider who is an active member in
good standing of the Rhode Island national guard.
(3) “Member in good standing” means any national guard member who is currently
satisfactorily participating in all unit training assemblies and annual training periods, as so certified
by the adjutant general.
(a)(b) Any person who is an active member in good standing of the Rhode Island national
guard, and who is eligible to attend at any state college or university in Rhode Island, will be eligible
for a tuition assistance educational benefit amounting to five (5) courses per semester at any Rhode
Island state college or university. National guard members may allocate their state-sponsored
tuition assistance benefits to their dependents. Basic tuition or general fee charges to be waived for
said five (5) courses. Each of the state colleges or universities shall receive an equal share of the
educational account funding for Rhode Island national guard members, the account to be
administered by the office of the adjutant general. The exact amount for each institution shall be

determined by the board of governors. The total amount of funds in the education account shall not
exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in any fiscal year.
(b)(c) In order to be eligible for tuition waivers for themself or their dependent, a person
national guard member must remain a member in good standing in the Rhode Island national guard
and the national guard member or their dependent must remain a student in good standing at any
state college or university. A member in good standing is defined as any soldier or airperson of the
Rhode Island national guard who is currently satisfactorily participating in all unit training
assemblies and annual training periods, as so certified by the adjutant general.
(c)(d) Those national guard members wishing to participate in this program must enter into
a contractual enlistment commitment that provides for one year of obligated service in the Rhode
Island national guard for each twelve (12) course credits or four (4) three-credit (3) courses where
the soldier’s or airperson’s national guard member’s or their dependent's tuition will be waived.
Such assistance shall be available for courses creditable to associate, bachelor’s, or master’s
degrees. Failure to satisfactorily fulfill the service obligation incurred in return for tuition assistance
will require the participant national guard member or their dependent to repay a pro-rata share of
said assistance. This obligation shall be considered to be a debt owed to the state and may be
satisfied by offset against any state transfer payments or state income tax refunds. The participating
member national guard member or their dependent shall reimburse the Rhode Island national guard
when any of the following occur: the soldier national guard member fails to participate
satisfactorily as a member of the Rhode Island national guard; the soldier national guard member
or their dependent withdraws from, or fails to complete, a course for personal reasons; the soldier
national guard member or their dependent fails to make up an incomplete grade within time limits
stipulated by the institution or one hundred twenty (120) days after the completion of the class,
whichever occurs first; or the soldier national guard member fails to provide the adjutant general a
copy of the national guard member's grade report within thirty (30) days of course completion and
may be subject to punishment under the Rhode Island military code.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004301
========
LC004301 - Page 2 of 3